Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1230.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(a)(4) of the act of July 10, 1990 (P.L.404, No.98), known as the Real Estate Appraisers Certification Act, is amended to read:Section 4. State Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers.(a) Creation.--There is hereby created the State Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers as a departmental administrative board in the Department of State. The board shall consist of the following members:* * *(4) Ten members [who are citizens of the United States and] who have been residents of this Commonwealth for a two-12345678910111213141516171819 year period immediately prior to appointment. Six of the members shall be State-certified real estate appraisers, two of the members shall be certified Pennsylvania evaluators and two of the members shall be public members. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the appointment of a professional member who is a certified Pennsylvania evaluator and also a State-certified real estate appraiser, except that the appointment shall specify in which capacity the member is being appointed.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1230PN1446 - 2 - 1234567891011